Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5589.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-22 of the General Laws entitled "Miscellaneous Rules" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-22-22.2. Prohibition of minors in rideshare vehicles.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person under the age of sixteen (16) years old from using a
rideshare vehicle, if the person is travelling alone. Rideshare vehicles shall include, but not be
limited to, Uber, Lyft, ARRO, Via, Hitch, Curb, Flywheel, Wingz, Gett, Grab or any other online
platform that uses a website to locate consumers for point-to-point ride services.
(b) No fine or sanction shall be imposed for a violation of this section and no record shall
be maintained of the occurrence.
(c) All law enforcement officers in this state are authorized to enforce this section by
removing the underage person from the vehicle and keeping the person in their custody until such
time as the person may be reunited with a parent or guardian.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001450
========